old/quarantine/spechyph-utf8-fr.tex
\patterns{
2'2
'a4
'â4
                    'ab3réa
                    'ae3s4ch
                    'amino1a2c
                    'ana3s4tr
                    'anti1a2
                    'anti1e2
                    'anti2enne
                    'anti1é2
                    'anti1s2
                    'apo2s3ta
                    'as2ta
1d'
'e4
'ê4
'é4
'è4
                    'en1a2
                    'en1o2
                    'eu2r1a2
  'ar3gent.
  'a2g3nat     % (df) 16/01/02
  'i2g3né      % (df) 16/01/02
  'i2g3ni      % (df) 16/01/02
'on3guent.
'i4
'î4
                    'in1a2
                    'in2a3nit
                    'in2augur
                    'in1e2
                    'in1é2
                    'in2effab
                    'in2é3lucta
                    'in2é3narra
                    'in2ept
                    'in2er
                    'in2exora
                    'in1i2
                    'in2i3miti
                    'in2i3q
                    'in2i3t
                    'in1o2
                    'in2o3cul
                    'in2ond
                    'in1s2tab
                    'inte4r3
                    'intera2
                    'intere2
                    'interé2
                    'interi2
                    'intero2
                    'interu2
                    'inters2
                    'in1u2
                    'in2uit
                    'in2u3l
'o4
'ô4
                    'oua1ou
                    'ovi1s2c
'ar3pent.
'u4
'û4
'y4
}
